Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB171.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
On or after the effective date of this Act, notwithstanding any provision of this chapter
or any other law to the contrary, a certificate of need issued by the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services or any other state agency shall not be required to establish or
operate a health facility or provide health services and all existing certificates of need
shall be deemed null and void.
Page 1 of 1
BR186900.100 - 1869 - XXXX 2/6/2026 9:35 AM Jacketed